Washington statutes.
RCW 10.32.130

Tribal warrants—Criminally or civilly liable. (Effective July 1, 2025.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1829-S.SL) ***

(1) A peace officer or a peace officer's legal advisor may not be held criminally or civilly liable for making an arrest under chapter 207, Laws of 2024 if the peace officer or the peace officer's legal advisor acted in good faith and without malice.

(2) Chapter 207, Laws of 2024 is not intended to limit, abrogate, or modify existing immunities for prosecuting attorneys for good faith conduct consistent with statutory duties.

[ 2024 c 207 s 14.]